Tennessee statutes. Title 33 Mental Health and Substance Abuse and Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities
Part 1

Community Service System

33-2-101. Services and support to be community-based system.

The department shall plan, coordinate, administer, monitor, and evaluate state and federally funded services and supports as a community-based system within the total system of services and supports for persons with mental illness, serious emotional disturbance, developmental disabilities, or at risk for those conditions and for their families. All functions shall be carried out in consultation and collaboration with current or former service recipients, their families, guardians or conservators, service recipient advocates, service providers, agencies, and other affected persons and organizations.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 2, §§ 33-2-101 — 33-2-108, 33-2-201 — 33-2-202, 33-2-301 — 33-2-311, 33-2-401, 33-2-501 — 33-2-513, 33-2-601 — 33-2-602, 33-2-604, 33-2-701, 33-2-901 — 33-2-909 (Acts 1965, ch. 82, § 8; 1973, ch. 341, §§ 3, 4; 1974, ch. 802, § 8; 1975, ch. 248, §§ 1, 3; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(35); 1978, ch. 617, § 2; 1978, ch. 853, §§ 1-9, 11-13; 1979, ch. 199, § 1; 1979, ch. 369, § 1; 1981, ch. 18, § 1; 1981, ch. 98, § 5; 1981, ch. 436, §§ 1, 4, 5; 1981, ch. 436, § 3; 1982, ch. 584, §§ 2, 4-12; 1983, ch. 323, §§ 25-28, 31; 33-201, T.C.A. § 33-350, 33-1801, T.C.A., §§ 33-1803 — 33-1812, T.C.A., §§ 33-1902 — 33-1911; 1985, ch. 437, § 5, 31-32; 1987, ch. 143, §§ 1, 6; 1987, ch. 248, §§ 1-3; 1987, ch. 320, § 1; 1988, ch. 586, § 1; 1988, ch. 828, §§ 3-8; 1988, ch. 875, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 253, § 3; 1989, ch. 254, § 3; 1989, ch. 255, § 2; 1989, ch. 256, § 2; 1989, ch. 257, § 3; 1989, ch. 259, § 3; 1989, ch. 260, § 3; 1989, ch. 261, § 3; 1989, ch. 271, § 3; 1989, ch. 272, § 3; 1989, ch. 434, § 5; 1989, ch. 513, §§ 1, 14; 1989, ch. 559, §§ 1-4; 1989, ch. 591, § 112; 1991, ch. 459, §§ 9, 10; 1992, ch. 913, § 2; 1993, ch. 234, §§ 22-26; 1994, ch. 760, § 1; 1996, ch. 796, § 1; 1996, ch. 1074, § 1; 1998, ch. 1005, § 1-9; 2000, ch. 947, § 6); § 33-2-603 (Acts 1985, ch. 437, § 31; 1987, ch. 143, § 5), which had been previously repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 586, § 2; § 33-2-801 (Acts 1989, ch. 513, § 4), which had been previously repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 234, § 9; §§ 33-2-802 and 33-2-803 (Acts 1989, ch. 513, § 4), which were transferred to §§ 68-24-602, 68-24-603 in 1993, is deleted and replaced in the revision of title 33 by Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1, effective March 1, 2001.

Law Reviews.

To Be or Not To Be in Tennessee: Deciding Surrogate Issues, 34 U. Mem. L. Rev. 333 (2004).

33-2-102. Goals and purposes of mental health care system.

Within the limits of available resources, it is the goal of the state to develop and maintain a system of care that provides a comprehensive array of quality prevention, early intervention, treatment, habilitation and rehabilitation services and supports that are geographically available, equitably and efficiently allocated statewide, allowing people to be in their own communities in settings, based on the needs and choices of individuals and families served.

The state's purposes are to:

Establish and sustain a broad range and scope of flexible services and supports across the domains of residential living, working, learning, community participation, and family support, including crisis, respite and other emergency services, that help service recipients maintain respected and active positions in the community; and

Promote the early identification of children with mental illness, serious emotional disturbance, developmental disabilities, and developmental delay to assure that they receive services and supports appropriate to their developmental level and changing needs.

The general assembly finds as facts that the needs of persons with mental illness, serious emotional disturbance, and developmental disabilities cannot be met by the department in isolation and that those persons need to receive services and supports that are integrated, have linkages between and among other human service agencies and programs, and have mechanisms for planning, developing, coordinating, and monitoring services and supports to meet their needs.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-2-103. Requirements for community-based systems.

The state will accomplish its purposes through community-based systems that provide:

Access to services and supports that are individualized to the capacities, needs and values of each person;

Accountability of services and supports through statewide standards for monitoring, reporting, and evaluating information;

At least basic quality standards for service delivery;

Priorities for the use of available resources;

Coordination of services and supports within the department, among other state agencies, and other public and private service providers aimed at reducing duplication in service delivery and promoting complementary services and supports among all relevant entities;

Conflict resolution procedures; and

Extensive involvement of service recipients, families, and advocates.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-2-104. Core values of service system.

The core values of the service system shall include:

The system of care is person-centered and family-focused, with the needs and choices of the individual and family, as appropriate, determining the types and mix of services and supports provided, because, to make good decisions, service recipients and their families need complete information about the availability, alternatives, and costs of services and supports, how the decision-making process works, and how to participate in that process;

The system of care provides individualized services and supports based on an individualized service plan that is comprehensive, coordinated, age appropriate, provides smooth transition through life stages, involves families as appropriate, and is developed by qualified professionals in consultation with service recipients and family members as appropriate;

The system of care is community-based and provides for service in the least restrictive, most appropriate setting;

The system of care is culturally competent with agencies, programs, services, and supports that are responsive to the cultural, racial, and ethnic differences of the populations they serve;

The system of care takes into account the safety and health of service recipients, while respecting their choices and protecting their rights, including their right to be free from abuse, neglect, and exploitation; and

The system of care is continuously improved based on research and best practices.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

Law Reviews.

One Fell Through the Cracks: Why Tennessee Needs an Initial Outpatient Commitment Statute (Lori R. Holyfield), 42 U. Mem. L. Rev. 221 (2011).

33-2-105. Geographic area for service systems — Designation of information sources.

The department shall establish areas for planning and resource allocation. The department shall define geographically dispersed and accessible points of access to service systems and designate providers or mechanisms to provide information and referral for services and supports and for eligibility decisions.

Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-2-106. Legislative intent — Alleviation of geographical disparities.

It is the intent of the general assembly that the system of care developed to reflect § 33-2-102 provides a comprehensive array of services and supports that are geographically available, equitably and efficiently allocated statewide and in each grand division of the state, that allows people to be in their own community settings, based on the needs and choices of individuals and families served. Services and supports provided to persons generally and as part of the medical assistance program, pursuant to title 71, chapter 5, shall seek to alleviate geographic service and support disparities across the state and its grand divisions. In striving to alleviate the geographic disparities, the state should seek to allocate budget improvements and other new resources in a manner that promotes equitable distribution of services and supports among the grand divisions of the state.

In order to implement subsection (a), the state shall strive to avoid gaps in services and endeavor to achieve a delivery system that ensures that services are available to service recipients on a substantially equitable basis, regardless of place of residence within the state. To that end, the commissioner of finance and administration shall report to the health and welfare committee of the senate and the health committee of the house of representatives, no later than January 15, 2008, and annually thereafter, on the following indicators of equity in the service delivery system:

The extent to which special services and programs such as programs for assertive community treatment (PACT), crisis stabilization units, resiliency and recovery programs, etc. are available on a substantially equitable basis throughout the state;

The extent to which psychiatric and medical services of the same level, intensity, and duration are available on a substantially equitable basis throughout the state; and

The extent to which rates of service utilization by service recipients are substantially equitable throughout the state.

Acts 2007, ch. 429, § 1; 2013, ch. 236, § 50.

Cross-References. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.